Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1031.02
Garnishment; costs; fee.

(1) The party seeking garnishment shall advance the costs of transcript and filing the matter in the district court.

(2) The district court shall be entitled to the following fee in civil matters: For issuance of a writ of execution, restitution, garnishment, attachment, and examination in aid of execution, a fee of five dollars each.

Laws 1955, c. 86, § 3, p. 259;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 16;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 12.